Utah statutes.
36-20-1.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Advisory committee" means the committee which proposes rules or changes in rules to the Supreme Court on civil procedure, criminal procedure, juvenile procedure, appellate procedure, evidence, and professional conduct.

(2)  "Committee" means the Judicial Rules Review Committee created in Section 36-20-2.

(3)  "Court rules" means any of the following:

(a)  rules of procedure, evidence, and practice for use of the courts of this state;

(b)  rules governing and managing the appellate process adopted by the Supreme Court;

(c)  rules adopted by the Judicial Council for the administration of the courts of the state.

(4)  "Judicial Council" means the administrative body of the courts as established in Article VIII, Sec. 12, Utah Constitution and Section 78A-2-104.

(5)  "Proposal for court rule" means the proposed language in a court rule that is submitted to the Judicial Council, the advisory committee, or the Supreme Court.

(6)  "Report" means a copy of the committee's findings and recommendations, any actions taken by the Supreme Court or Judicial Council in response, and any recommendation for legislation for Supreme Court or Judicial Council rulemaking action as provided in Subsection 36-20-6(3).

